Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Merit System
36-4-22.
Promotion examinations and lists.

Promotional examinations shall be conducted in the same manner as open competitive examinations subject to the following conditions:

A person is eligible for promotional examination provided the employee is currently employed in the classified, unclassified, or nonclassified service as of the official closing date of the examination announcement or twenty one (21) calendar days prior to the administration of the first phase of the examination, whichever is later, and meets one or more of the following requirements:

Any employee who holds or within three (3) years has held permanent status in the classified service;

Any employee who is serving in a probationary period as of the official closing date of the examination announcement;

A minority (as currently defined in federal employment law as Blacks, Hispanics, American Indians including Alaska Natives, and Asians including Pacific Islanders) who is a qualified exam applicant seeking entry to a classification where there is a manifest imbalance in the job category; or

Any employee who has served twelve (12) months service in the classified, unclassified, or nonclassified service and, in addition, meets the minimum requirements established in the class specification.

Promotion lists shall remain in effect for a period of three (3) years or until exhausted or until combined with or replaced by a more recently prepared list.

This section shall not apply to the Rhode Island state police or the legislative branch of state government.

An employee who is not on the promotional list shall be eligible to take the promotional examination for the position the employee occupies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-22

; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 38, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 133, § 7.

36-4-23.
Preferred reemployment list.

Any person in the classified service who holds permanent status and is laid off as a result of reorganization, abolishment of positions by reason of reduction of force due to lack of work or lack of funds shall be placed on the list in the order of length of service and appointment therefrom shall be in the same order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 418, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 69, § 1.

36-4-23.1.
Reemployment lists.

Any person who holds full status in the classified service and resigns in good standing shall be entitled to have his or her name placed on an appropriate reemployment list, provided that the person so requests in writing within three (3) years of the date of his or her termination from the state service. Any person with full status who has resigned and whose appointing authority has failed to certify that he or she has resigned in good standing or any person with full status who has been dismissed from the classified service may request in writing within three (3) years of the date of his or her termination that his or her name be placed on the appropriate reemployment list and the request may be granted at the discretion of the personnel administrator. Each name placed on a reemployment list shall be stricken therefrom at the expiration of three (3) years from the official termination date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 6; P.L. 1950, ch. 2456, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-23

; P.L. 1986, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 69, § 1.

36-4-24.
Removal of disqualified names from lists.

The personnel administrator may remove the name of any person from any list or lists who is physically so disabled as to be rendered unfit for performance of the required duties; or who is addicted to the use of narcotics or excessive use of intoxicating liquors; or who has been found guilty of any infamous or notoriously disgraceful conduct; or who has made false statement of material fact in his or her application; or who has terminated or retired from state service, except as provided under §

36-4-23.1

; and those individuals who have had their certification notices returned with no forwarding address provided the notice was sent by certified mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-24

; P.L. 1987, ch. 556, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 313, § 1.

36-4-25.
Designation of appropriate list for filling of vacancies.

The preferred reemployment list shall have precedence over all other lists for the filling of vacancies of comparable or less comparable positions in state service until the list is exhausted. Vacancies in positions in the classified service shall be filled as far as practicable by promotional appointments. Whenever a vacancy does exist in any position in the classified service, the appointing authority may choose to use either the employment, promotion, or reemployment list to fill the vacancy and shall request the personnel administrator to certify the names of persons eligible for appointment from the designated list; provided, however, that in the event of the reorganization of a department or division, or the abolishment of a position or positions in state service, any classified employee with permanent status affected thereby shall be placed in a comparable position within the department or division. If, however, placement within the department or division is not possible, then the affected employee shall be placed in a comparable position elsewhere in state service. Whenever a position is allocated or reallocated upward, the classified employee with permanent status holding that position shall be given an opportunity to qualify for the allocated or reallocated position by taking a qualifying examination and shall be placed on leave of absence from the old position until the employee has gained status or failed to qualify for the position.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, §§ 12, 14; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; P.L. 1955, ch. 3527, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-25

; P.L. 1965, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 418, § 2.

36-4-26.
Certification and appointment to positions in classified service.

If the appointing authority has designated the employment list, the personnel administrator shall immediately certify the names of the six (6) persons standing highest thereon who are available for appointment, if there are as many as six (6) names thereon, or all the names on the list if there are less than six (6). If any of the eligibles notifies the personnel administrator that he or she is unavailable for appointment, another name shall be certified to the appointing authority. The appointing authority shall appoint one of the persons so certified to the position from the appropriate list, or in accordance with the special certification provided for in §

36-4-26.1

of this chapter. If he or she has designated the promotional list, certification shall be made in the manner prescribed for the employment list. If he or she has designated the reemployment list, the names of all available eligibles on the list shall be certified to him or her for appointment. He or she may choose from any of the names so certified. If there are as many as three (3) available eligibles certified from an employment list, a promotion list, or a reemployment list, the appointing authority shall make an appointment from one of these lists. If there are less than three (3) available eligibles certified from any of these lists, the appointing authority may choose to appoint one of the persons so certified. If the appointing authority decides not to make an appointment from any of the names so certified when there are less than three (3) available eligibles, the personnel administrator shall certify the names of three (3) available eligibles from any list which he or she shall declare to be appropriate and the appointing authority shall appoint one of the persons so certified. If there are less than three (3) available eligibles certified from an appropriate list, the appointing authority may elect to appoint one of the names so certified or may make a temporary appointment of some other person as hereinafter provided. Whenever the personnel administrator is requested to certify names to fill more than one vacancy in a given class, he or she shall certify to each of the appointing authorities concerned one additional name for each additional vacancy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, §§ 12, 14; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; P.L. 1955, ch. 3527, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-26

; P.L. 1994, ch. 133, § 8.

36-4-26.1.
Supplemental certification in the civil service — Expanded certification for equal opportunity and affirmative action.

To eliminate the overall adverse impact of systemic barriers to the employment of minorities as a protected class, the office of personnel administration shall provide all appointing authorities the necessary flexibility to remedy the effects of systemic discriminatory practices. Supplemental certification does not guarantee employment of protected classes. It guarantees the appointing authority increased opportunities, where possible, to appoint qualified employees from an expanded eligibility list whenever a department can demonstrate that there is statistical underrepresentation based on demographic analysis, otherwise called a “manifest imbalance” elsewhere in this chapter.

Wherever a manifest imbalance exists, as substantiated by the appointing authority and certified by the equal opportunity administrator in conjunction with the state personnel administrator, a supplemental certification list of minorities may be called for in addition to the appropriate employment or promotion list, except in the following instances:

The absence of statistical data or reasonable evidence to show significant past discrimination, patterns of possible discrimination, and/or adverse impact on the protected classes;

The presence of at least one minority ranked among the three (3) persons standing highest on the list of persons certified by the personnel administrator for the position in question;

The absence of any minorities on the appropriate eligibility list; or

Any instance in which the department or agency is subject to a contradictory or inconsistent court order.

Supplemental certifications based on race or color as a protected class shall be made by an appointing authority whenever:

The appointing authority shall make requisition to fill one or more positions included in the appointing authority’s affirmative action plan on file with the equal opportunity administrator;

The equal opportunity administrator has made a written determination substantiating that previous practices of the department and/or of the appointing authority with respect to the filling of the position or positions have discriminated against minorities in contravention of any provision of the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Rhode Island, title VII of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000e) or any other federal or state statute; and

Eligible minorities have passed an examination for the classification being recruited and/or other list deemed appropriate by the personnel administrator.

At least seven (7) days prior to certifying names under this section, the appointing authority shall post a notice of intention to do so in the offices of the personnel administrator and of the equal opportunity administrator, and shall mail a copy of the notice to the applicable union, if any, with instructions to post copies of the notice at all locations where persons whose names may be certified under the provisions of this section may, if employed, be assigned.

In certifying names for appointment to a classification for which supplemental certification is required, the personnel administrator shall include upon the applicable list the names of six (6) persons certified pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 133, § 9.

36-4-27.
Unlawful procurement of waiver or withdrawal.

An appointing authority or other person who shall procure the signing of a waiver or otherwise induce an eligible to withdraw his or her name through fraud, misrepresentation, duress, or promise shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; P.L. 1955, ch. 3527, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-27

.

36-4-28.
Probationary period.

All original appointments and promotional appointments to the classified service shall be for a probationary period of six (6) months, during which time the appointment authority shall report to the personnel administrator every sixty (60) days concerning the work of the employee and at the expiration of the probationary period unless the appointing authority files with the personnel administrator a statement in writing that the services of the employee during the probationary period have not been satisfactory and that it is not desired that he or she be continued in the service, he or she shall receive permanent status in this classification. Any employee may be dismissed by the appointing authority during the probationary period for reasons relating to the employee’s qualifications or for the good of the service stated by the appointing authority in writing and filed with the personnel administrator. The probationary period is further defined to be one hundred and thirty (130) days worked in the classified position to which the person has been appointed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 12; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-28

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1970, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 365, § 1.

36-4-29.
Restoration to former position of promotional appointees dismissed during probation.

Any promotional appointee who is dismissed from the position to which he or she was promoted during the probationary period or at the conclusion thereof by reason of the failure of the appointing authority to file a request for his or her continuance in the position shall be restored to the position from which he or she was promoted even though it should be necessary to lay off a person holding his or her former position.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 14; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-29

.

36-4-30.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-30

; P.L. 1987, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 197, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2007, ch. 332, § 2, effective July 6, 2007; P.L. 2007, ch. 435, § 2, effective July 6, 2007.

36-4-31.
Temporary appointment when no list available.

Whenever it is not possible to certify the required number of eligible persons for appointment to a vacancy in the classified service because no appropriate list exists, the appointing authority may nominate a person to the personnel administrator and if the nominee is found by the personnel administrator to have had experience and education that appear to qualify him or her for the position and meets such other requirements as are established by this chapter and the personnel rules, he or she may be temporarily appointed to fill the vacancy. All persons with temporary status who have been or who shall be temporarily appointed to those vacancies shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until removed in accordance with other provisions of this chapter. The personnel administrator shall within one year of the appointment of the temporary appointee establish an appropriate list. In the event the personnel administrator has failed or fails to establish an appropriate list within one year of a temporary appointment, the temporary employee shall become a provisional employee until a suitable list is established, at which time the appropriate merit system laws, rules, and regulations shall apply.

Whenever any provisional employee who is serving in a competitive branch position within the classified service completes five (5) consecutive years of satisfactory service, and the personnel administrator has failed to establish a timely appropriate list as required by subsection (a)(1) during that time, that provisional employee shall be deemed to have qualified for his or her position and shall be awarded permanent status, without the need of examination.

When an appropriate list is established for a position held by a temporary or provisional appointee, the position shall be deemed to be vacant for the purposes of certification and appointment, and no salary or other compensation shall be paid to any temporary or provisional appointee for services in the position for more than fifteen (15) days after certification of at least three (3) available eligibles from the appropriate list.

Any employee who holds temporary or provisional status for at least twelve (12) consecutive months in the class in which he or she is serving and who takes the appropriate examination for the position shall receive in addition to his or her test score five (5) additional points for each year of state service, which shall be added to his or her test score; provided, however, that in no case shall an employee receive credit for more than four (4) years of service. An employee who holds temporary provisional status for at least twelve (12) consecutive months in the class in which he or she is serving and is found to be reachable for certification to the position he or she holds shall be appointed to the position unless the appointing authority certifies to the personnel administrator that the individual’s service has been unsatisfactory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 13; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-31

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 6; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 19.

36-4-32.
Emergency appointments.

In case of emergency, an appointing authority may request an emergency appointment of any person to any position without regard to provisions of this chapter to carry on work that must be continued in the public interest, but no such emergency appointment shall continue for more than thirty (30) working days in a twelve (12) month period nor shall successive emergency appointments be made. Approvals for these appointments shall be requested in writing in advance to the personnel administrator. The appointments must be approved by the personnel administrator and the state budget officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 13; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-32

; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2.

36-4-33.
War duration appointments.

Whenever in time of war a vacancy exists in any position in the classified service by reason of the position having been vacated by a person entering the armed forces of the United States or assigned to a position in a federal agency by action of the governor, the vacancy shall be filled in the manner prescribed in §§

36-4-25

—

36-4-27

; provided, however, that any appointment made to a position vacated by a person entering the armed forces of the United States in time of war shall be known as a “war duration appointment”; and any person appointed to that position shall, while he or she holds that position, be entitled to the same rights and privileges enjoyed by persons appointed to permanent positions except that those rights and privileges shall be limited by and subject to any existing prior rights of another employee on leave from that position even if the exercise of those prior rights shall result in the separation from the position of the person whose appointment bears the later date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 13; P.L. 1943, ch. 1350, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-33

.

36-4-34.
Transfers within classified service.

An appointing authority may at any time transfer any classified employee under his or her jurisdiction from one position to another in the same class of position. In every such case the appointing authority shall give written notice of his or her action to the personnel administrator, according to the rules therefor prescribed. Transfer of a classified employee from a position under the jurisdiction of one appointing authority to a position under the jurisdiction of another appointing authority may be made subject to rules established therefor, with the approval of the personnel administrator and of both appointing authorities concerned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 15; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-34

; P.L. 1980, ch. 365, § 1.

36-4-34.1.
Transfer of state employees.

The director of the department of administration (the “director”) is hereby authorized to transfer any employee within the executive branch who is not covered by a collective bargaining unit as provided in chapter 11 of this title. Any employee may be transferred to a comparable position upon the approval of the director of the department of administration and the personnel administrator. The transfers may be initially authorized for a period up to one year’s duration and may be further extended with the approval of the personnel administrator (the “personnel administrator”).

Within seven (7) days of making a transfer of any employee or further extending the duration of a transfer, the director making the transfer or the personnel administrator extending the transfer shall file a written report with the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees, for each employee to be transferred. This report shall include:

The identity of the employee;

The employee’s current work position and location, and the proposed new work position and location;

The reason(s) for the employee transfer;

The specific task(s) to be assigned to and completed by the transferred employee;

An explanation of how the task(s) to be completed by the transferred employee relates to the mission of the transferee department, division, or agency; and

The anticipated duration of the employee’s transfer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 5, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 11.

36-4-35.
Demotions.

An appointing authority may demote a classified employee under his or her jurisdiction from a position in a class to a position in a lower class, subject to the personnel rules therefor prescribed. In every case the appointing authority shall give the personnel administrator and the employee written notice of his or her intention to effect the demotion not less than fifteen (15) days before the date it is intended to become effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 15; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-35

.

36-4-36.
Disciplinary suspensions.

An appointing authority may, for disciplinary purposes, suspend a classified employee without pay for a period or periods not exceeding a total of thirty (30) days in any twelve (12) month period. In every case the appointing authority shall on or before the effective date of the suspension, give written notice of his or her action to the employee and shall notify the personnel administrator not later than three (3) days after the effective date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 16; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-36

.

36-4-37.
Layoffs — Preference for retention or reemployment.

An appointing authority may lay off a classified employee whenever he or she deems it necessary because of a material change in duties or organization, or shortage or stoppage of work or funds. In every case of layoff, the appointing authority shall, before the effective date of the layoff, give written notice of his or her action to the personnel administrator and the employee and shall certify that consideration has been given to length and quality of service of all employees in the affected class under his or her jurisdiction. No employee with full status shall be laid off while probational, provisional, or temporary employees are employed by the same appointing authority in the same class of positions. No probationary employee shall be laid off while provisional or temporary employees are employed by the same appointing authority in the same class of positions. No provisional employee shall be laid off while temporary employees are employed by the same appointing authority in the same class of positions. Nor shall any temporary appointment be made to any position in the class by the appointing authority while any employee who has been laid off by the appointing authority is available for certification from a reemployment list. Any person who has held full status and who has been laid off shall have his or her name placed on the appropriate reemployment list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 16; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-37

; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3.

36-4-38.
Dismissal.

A classified employee with temporary status may be dismissed at the pleasure of an appointing authority under the provisions of §

36-4-31

. A classified employee with provisional or probationary status may be dismissed for reasons relating to the employee’s qualifications or for the good of the service. A classified employee with permanent status may be dismissed by an appointing authority whenever he or she considers the good of the service to be served thereby, stated in writing, with full and sufficient reason, and filed with the personnel administrator. Any removal or separation of an employee from the classified service not otherwise provided for in this chapter shall be deemed to be a dismissal. In every case of dismissal, the appointing authority shall on or before the effective date thereof give written notice of this action and the reason therefor to the employee and shall file a copy of the notice with the personnel administrator not later than three (3) days after the effective date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 16; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 10; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-38

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3.

36-4-39.
Retirement or transfer to light duty.

When an employee has become physically or mentally incapable of or unfit for the efficient performance of the duties of his or her position by reason of infirmities due to advanced age or other disability, it shall be the duty of the appointing authority to transfer the employee to less arduous duties or to order his or her retirement. The appeal procedure established for dismissals shall apply to retirements ordered under authority of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 16; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-39

.

36-4-40.
Appeal from administrator to administrator of adjudication.

Any person with provisional, probationary, or permanent status who feels aggrieved by an action of the personnel administrator may, within ten (10) calendar days of the mailing of the notice of that action, make a request in writing for an appeal hearing to the administrator of adjudication for the department of administration, and be heard within fourteen (14) calendar days of receipt of the appeal request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-40

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 188, § 1.

36-4-40.1.
Administrator of adjudication — Duties.

The administrator of adjudication or his or her designee shall hear all appeals from decisions of the personnel administrator as provided in this chapter and chapter 3 of this title. The administrator of adjudication shall hear such other appeal requests as may be provided by law or as authorized by the director of the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 188, § 3.

36-4-40.2.
Hearings — Appeals.

Immediately upon receipt of a written appeal request, the administrator of adjudication shall send a notice to all parties involved, pursuant to §

42-35-9

. Hearings shall be held in an informal manner. However, the rules of evidence shall be followed whenever possible and a record of all hearings shall be made, either stenographically or by mechanical recording means.

The administrator of adjudication shall, within twenty (20) calendar days of the hearing, render a decision in writing stating all pertinent facts and issues presented at the hearing, which decision shall contain findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated.

Parties shall be notified either personally or by mail of the decision. Upon request, a copy of the decision shall be delivered or mailed forthwith to each party and to his or her attorney of record.

A copy of a decision and transcript of a hearing shall be forwarded to the personnel appeal board when an appeal is taken. The cost of a transcript so supplied shall be borne by the appellant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 188, § 3.

36-4-41.
Appeal from administrator of adjudication to appeal board.

Any person with provisional, probationary, or permanent status who feels aggrieved by a decision of the administrator of adjudication may, within thirty (30) calendar days of the rendering of a decision, request in writing for the personnel appeal board to review the decision or conduct a public hearing. Within thirty (30) calendar days of the receipt of the request, the personnel appeal board shall make a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor based upon the decisions of the administrator of adjudication or the testimony taken at a hearing. Copies of the report shall be forwarded to the office of labor relations within the department of administration and to the office of the administrator of adjudication. Within fifteen (15) calendar days of the receipt of the report, the governor shall make his or her decision and so notify the appellant, the personnel appeal board, administrator of adjudication, and the office of labor relations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-41

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1977, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 212, § 1.

36-4-42.
Appeal from appointing authority to appeal board.

Any state employee with provisional, probationary, or permanent status who feels aggrieved by an action of an appointing authority resulting in a demotion, suspension, layoff, or dismissal or by any personnel action which an appointing authority might take which causes the person to believe that he or she had been discriminated against because of his or her race, sex, age, disability, or his or her political or religious beliefs, may, within thirty (30) calendar days of the mailing of the notice of that action, appeal in writing to the personnel appeal board for a review or public hearing. Within thirty (30) days after conclusion of the hearing the personnel appeal board shall render a decision and shall notify the affected employee and other interested parties of the decision which may confirm or reduce the demotion, suspension, layoff, or dismissal of the employee or may reinstate the employee and the board may order payment of part or all of the salary to the employee for the period of time he or she was demoted, suspended, laid off, or dismissed. The decision of the board shall be final and binding upon all parties concerned, and upon the finding of the personnel administrator, or upon appeal, in favor of the employee, the employee shall be forthwith returned to his or her office or position without loss of compensation, seniority, or any other benefits he or she may have enjoyed, or under such terms as the appeal board shall determine. The employee who is returned to his or her office or position by the appeal board following a review or public hearing shall be granted by the state of Rhode Island counsel fees, payable to his or her representative counsel, of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day his or her counsel is required to appear before the appeal board in the behalf of the aggrieved employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 18; P.L. 1954, ch. 3324, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3605, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-42

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1967, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 10.

36-4-43.
Conditions of service.

Conditions of service such as hours of work, attendance regulation, overtime, holidays, pay plan regulation, and leave regulation shall be prescribed by the personnel rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 17; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-43

.

36-4-44.
Training programs.

The personnel administrator shall cooperate with appointing authorities and other supervising officials in the conduct of employee training programs to the end that the quality of service rendered by persons in the classified service may be continually improved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 18; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-44

.

36-4-45.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 18; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-45

; Repealed by P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 2, effective May 8, 1984.

36-4-46.
Reports of changes in status of employees.

Every appointment, transfer, promotion, dismissal, vacancy, change of salary rate, leave of absence, absence from duty, and other temporary or permanent change in status of employees in both the unclassified service and the classified service shall be reported to the personnel administrator at such time, in such form, and together with such supporting or pertinent information as the personnel rules shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 19; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-46

.

36-4-47.
Personnel roster and records — Tabulation and analysis of data.

The personnel administrator shall maintain a perpetual roster of all officers and employees in the unclassified and classified services and all persons from other departments or agencies of the state which receive funds from the state showing for each person the title of the position held, the position number, his or her departmental or other agency assignment, his or her salary rate, date of appointment, complete employment history, and other such data as the personnel administrator deems pertinent. The personnel administrator shall also maintain other such personnel records as he or she considers desirable, and shall make available to the governor, the legislature, the director, department and institution executives, and other persons having a proper interest therein, tabulations and analyses of such personnel data as he or she has available. A similar perpetual roster shall also be maintained showing for each person named the title of the position held, the position number, his or her departmental or other agency assignment, his or her salary rate and date of employment which shall be made available for public inspection at the request of any person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 19; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-47

; P.L. 1972, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 107, § 1.

36-4-48.
Certification of payrolls and accounts.

All payrolls for the payment of a salary or other compensation for personal services shall contain the names of every person to be paid and shall be certified to the state controller by the appointing authority or his or her duly authorized agent to the effect that the persons named on the payroll or account have been appointed or employed or otherwise established in their positions according to the provisions of law and that the payroll is in conformity with the merit system act and existing state personnel rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-48

; P.L. 1964, ch. 99, § 1.

36-4-49.
Recovery of unlawful payments.

Any payment violating the provisions of the pay plan or the rules pertaining thereto, made to a person appointed or established in his or her position in a manner contrary to the provisions of this chapter, may be recovered from the appointing authority, or any officer or person making the payment, whoever is culpable, or from the sureties on the official bond of that officer or person. Action for the recovery may be maintained by the director, any officer, or employee of the state service, or any citizen of the state. All money recovered under this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 20; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-49

.

36-4-50.
Merit as basis — Discrimination prohibited.

Except as provided in §

36-4-50.1

, the determinations of eligibility for appointments, promotions, and demotions in and dismissals from the classified service shall be based solely upon merit, regardless of race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, country of origin, or ancestral origin, consistent with collective bargaining agreements, and consistent with title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000e et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-50

; P.L. 1975, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 149, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 280, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 323, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 10.

36-4-50.1.
Certification of select positions.

The personnel administrator in consultation with the equal employment opportunity administrator within the department of administration shall identify classes of positions within state government in which there exists a need for a particular linguistic background or skill. Service oriented departments of state, including, but not limited to, Rhode Island state police, labor and training, corrections, children, youth, and families, courts, human services, and transportation shall identify those positions that will best serve persons utilizing the services of the departments and notify the personnel administrator of those positions. Based on recognition by the aforementioned administrators that a need for employees with a specific linguistic background or skill exists in order to serve the client population, the personnel administrator is authorized during the initial hiring process to certify names from other than the top six names on a certified list as required by §

36-4-26

. The personnel administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations under the administrative procedures act to carry out the provisions of this section; furthermore, it is the legislative intent of the general assembly that the rules and regulations shall be promulgated with due regard to the linguistic background of the population to be served, to the specific requirements of this section, to other relevant provisions of this chapter, and to the terms of existing collective bargaining agreements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 280, § 2.

36-4-51.
Running for elective office by classified employee. [Effective until January 1, 2023.]

No classified employee or member of the personnel appeal board shall seek the nomination of or be a candidate for any elective state office; neither shall any state elective officer be appointed a member of the personnel appeal board or a classified employee unless he or she resigns his or her elective office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-51

; P.L. 1980, ch. 365, § 1.